Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF2895.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 179A.18, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. School district requirements. Except as otherwise provided by section 179A.17, subdivision 1, teachers employed by a local school district, other than principals and assistant principals, may strike only under the following circumstances: (1)(i) the collective bargaining agreement between their exclusive representative and their employer has expired or, if there is no agreement, impasse under section 179A.17, subdivision 1, has occurred; deleted text begin anddeleted text end (ii) the exclusive representative and the employer have participated in mediation over a period of at least 30 days. For the purposes of this item the mediation period commences on the day that a mediator designated by the commissioner first attends a meeting with the parties to negotiate the issues not agreed upon; deleted text begin anddeleted text end (iii) neither party has requested interest arbitration or a request for binding interest arbitration has been rejected; deleted text begin ordeleted text end new text begin andnew text end new text begin (iv) the employer has not offered a collective bargaining agreement that increases future district costs for salaries and benefits by at least the maximum increase available in accordance with subdivision 2a; or new text end (2) the employer violates section 179A.13, subdivision 2, clause (9). new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective for collective bargaining agreements effective July 1, 2025, and thereafter. new text end Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 179A.18, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 2a. new text end new text begin School district increased salary and benefits cap. new text end new text begin (a) For purposes of this section, the "maximum increase available" means the total increase in cost of terms in a collective bargaining agreement, including salary and benefits, compared to the previous collective bargaining agreement. new text end new text begin (b) Before beginning negotiations with an exclusive representative of school district employees, the employer must determine the maximum increase available for a collective bargaining agreement based on the change in the state's gross domestic product and population growth in the district during the previous two years. The employer must provide notice to the exclusive representative of district employees of this maximum salary and benefits increase. If the final collective bargaining agreement between the board and an exclusive representative includes salary, benefit, or other terms that collectively exceed the maximum increase available, the employer must provide notice to residents in the district of the increase, and explain the reasons for exceeding the maximum increase available at an open meeting. new text end new text begin (c) Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, school district employees are not authorized to strike if the employer has offered a collective bargaining agreement, the costs of which would meet or exceed the maximum increase available identified under paragraph (b). new text end new text begin (d) The commissioner of management and budget must issue guidance to school boards on how to calculate the maximum increase available based on changes in the state's gross domestic product and population changes. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective for collective bargaining agreements effective July 1, 2025, and thereafter. new text end